bg-BG: Тип корекция: Регулируем (врътка); Регулируем (фиксиращ винт); Регулируем (подложка); Нерегулируем; Други
ru: Тип регулировки: Регулируемый (поворотная ручка); Регулируемый (установочный винт); Регулируемый (прокладка); Нерегулируемый; Другое
cs: Typ nastavení: Nastavitelné (otočný knoflík); Nastavitelné (stavěcí šroub); Nastavitelné (podložka); Nenastavitelné; Ostatní
pt-PT: Tipo de ajuste: Ajustável (botão); Ajustável (parafuso de fixação); Ajustável (calço); Não ajustável; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta prilagodbe: Podesivo (gumb); Podesivo (vijak za podešavanje); Podesivo (podloška); Nepodesivo; Ostalo
de: Anpassungsart: Einstellbar (Drehknopf); Einstellbar (Stellschraube); Einstellbar (Shim); Nicht einstellbar; Andere
vi: Loại điều chỉnh: Có thể điều chỉnh (núm xoay); Có thể điều chỉnh (vít cấy); Có thể điều chỉnh (miếng chêm); Không thể điều chỉnh; Khác
el: Τύπος προσαρμογής: Ρυθμιζόμενο (περιστροφικός διακόπτης); Ρυθμιζόμενο (βίδα στερέωσης); Ρυθμιζόμενο (ροδέλα/προσθήκη); Μη ρυθμιζόμενο; Άλλο
ko: 조정 유형: 조절식(노브); 조절식(세트 스크류); 조절식(심); 조절 불가; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta prilagoditve: Nastavljivo (gumb); Nastavljivo (nastavitveni vijak); Nastavljivo (podložka); Nenastavljivo; Drugo
fi: Säätötyyppi: Säädettävä (nuppi); Säädettävä (säätöruuvi); Säädettävä (säätölevy); Ei säädettävä; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de reglare: Ajustabil (buton); Ajustabil (șurub de fixare); Ajustabil (șaibă); Neajustabil; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de ajuste: Ajustável (botão); Ajustável (parafuso de fixação); Ajustável (calço); Não ajustável; Outros
hu: Beállítás típusa: Állítható (forgógombos); Állítható (állítócsavaros); Állítható (hézagolós); Nem állítható; Egyéb
da: Justeringstype: Justerbar (knap); Justerbar (pinolskrue); Justerbar (mellemlægsskive); Ikke-justerbar; Anden
tr: Ayarlama türü: Ayarlanabilir (düğme); Ayarlanabilir (ayar vidası); Ayarlanabilir (şim/pul); Ayarlanamaz; Diğer
nl: Type afstelling: Verstelbaar (knop); Verstelbaar (stelschroef); Verstelbaar (vulplaatje); Niet-verstelbaar; Overig
th: ประเภทการปรับตั้ง: แบบปรับได้ (ปุ่มหมุน); แบบปรับได้ (สกรูตัวหนอน); แบบปรับได้ (แผ่นชิม); ปรับไม่ได้; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ úpravy: Nastaviteľné (gombík); Nastaviteľné (nastavovacia skrutka); Nastaviteľné (podložka); Nenastaviteľné; Iné
fr: Type de réglage: Réglable (molette); Réglable (vis de pression); Réglable (cale); Non réglable; Autre
zh-TW: 調整類型: 可調式 (旋鈕); 可調式 (固定螺絲); 可調式 (墊片); 不可調; 其他
es: Tipo de ajuste: Ajustable (perilla); Ajustable (tornillo de fijación); Ajustable (cuña); No ajustable; Otro
it: Tipo di regolazione: Regolabile (manopola); Regolabile (vite di fissaggio); Regolabile (spessore); Non regolabile; Altro
sv: Justeringstyp: Justerbar (ratt); Justerbar (ställskruv); Justerbar (mellanlägg); Ej justerbar; Övrigt
lt-LT: Reguliavimo tipas: Reguliuojamas (rankenėle); Reguliuojamas (fiksavimo varžtu); Reguliuojamas (tarpikliu); Nereguliuojamas; Kita
zh-CN: 调整类型: 可调节（旋钮）; 可调节（定位螺丝）; 可调节（垫片）; 不可调; 其他
ja: 調整タイプ: 調整可能 (ノブ); 調整可能 (止めネジ); 調整可能 (シム); 調整不可; その他
nb: Justeringstype: Justerbar (knott); Justerbar (settskrue); Justerbar (shim); Ikke-justerbar; Annet
pl: Rodzaj regulacji: Regulowany (pokrętło); Regulowany (śruba dociskowa); Regulowany (podkładka); Nieregulowany; Inne
en: Adjustment type: Adjustable (knob); Adjustable (set screw); Adjustable (shim); Non-adjustable; Other